test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-A-miistsís_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - miistsísa - ok : # -m animate noun, tree AEW NA1
     miistsísa+NA+Sg: miistsísa
     miistsísa+NA+Pl: miistsíksi
     miistsísa+NA+Obv: miistsíyi
     miistsísa+NA+Non: miistsíí
     
     miistsísa+NA+Px1Sg+Sg: nitsiistsíma
     miistsísa+NA+Px1Sg+Pl: nitsiistsímiksi
     miistsísa+NA+Px1Sg+Obv: nitsiistsími
     miistsísa+NA+Px1Sg+Non: nitsiistsími
     
     miistsísa+NA+Px1Pl+Sg: nitsiistsíminnaana
     miistsísa+NA+Px1Pl+Pl: nitsiistsíminnaaniksi
     miistsísa+NA+Px1Pl+Obv: nitsiistsíminnaani
     miistsísa+NA+Px1Pl+Non: nitsiistsíminnaani

     miistsísa+NA+Px21Pl+Sg: kitsiistsíminnoona
     miistsísa+NA+Px21Pl+Pl: kitsiistsíminnooniksi
     miistsísa+NA+Px21Pl+Obv: kitsiistsíminnooni
     miistsísa+NA+Px21Pl+Non: kitsiistsíminnooni

     miistsísa+NA+Px2Sg+Sg: kitiistsíma
     miistsísa+NA+Px2Sg+Pl: kitiistsímiksi
     miistsísa+NA+Px2Sg+Obv: kitiistsími
     miistsísa+NA+Px2Sg+Non: kitiistsími

     miistsísa+NA+Px2Pl+Sg: kitiistsímoaawa
     miistsísa+NA+Px2Pl+Pl: kitiistsímoaawaiksi
     miistsísa+NA+Px2Pl+Obv: kitiistsímoaawayi
     miistsísa+NA+Px2Pl+Non: kitiistsímoaawai

     miistsísa+NA+Px3Sg+Sg: otiistsíma
     miistsísa+NA+Px3Sg+Pl: otiistsímiksi
     miistsísa+NA+Px3Sg+Obv: otiistsími
     miistsísa+NA+Px3Sg+Non: otiistsími

     miistsísa+NA+Px3Pl+Sg: otiistsímoaawa
     miistsísa+NA+Px3Pl+Pl: otiistsímoaawaiksi
     miistsísa+NA+Px3Pl+Obv: otiistsímoaawayi
     miistsísa+NA+Px3Pl+Non: otiistsímoaawai
